New York, session 2025-2026, S5280.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 467-b of the real property tax law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph j to read as follows: 3 j. the entity responsible for the administration of the tax abatement 4 program shall develop and implement a plan to ensure adequate access to 5 information by individuals who have limited English proficiency or 6 otherwise require communication assistance. Such entity shall: 7 (1) translate necessary documents, including but not limited to, forms 8 and instructions provided to or completed by the program beneficiaries 9 or participants, into the six most common non-English languages spoken 10 by individuals with limited English proficiency in the municipality that 11 offers this program pursuant to subdivision two of this section; 12 (2) offer, upon request, interpretation services between the entity 13 administering the program and an individual in the individual's primary 14 language with respect to the provision of services or benefits; and 15 (3) offer, upon request or demonstrated need, services to an individ- 16 ual who requires additional assistance due to partial or total deafness, 17 blindness, speech impediment, or cognitive impairment. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01863-02-6 S. 5280--A 2 1 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 467 of the real property tax law, as 2 amended by section 4 of part K of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 5. (a) Application for such exemption must be made by the owner, or 5 all of the owners of the property, on forms prescribed by the commis- 6 sioner to be furnished by the appropriate assessing authority and shall 7 furnish the information and be executed in the manner required or 8 prescribed in such forms, and shall be filed in such assessor's office 9 on or before the appropriate taxable status date. Notwithstanding any 10 other provision of law, at the option of the municipal corporation, any 11 person otherwise qualifying under this section shall not be denied the 12 exemption under this section if such person becomes sixty-five years of 13 age after the appropriate taxable status date and on or before December 14 thirty-first of the same year. 15 (b) The assessing authority responsible for the administration of such 16 tax exemption shall develop and implement a plan to ensure adequate 17 access to information by individuals who have limited English proficien- 18 cy or otherwise require communication assistance. Such authority shall: 19 (1) translate necessary documents, including but not limited to, forms 20 and instructions provided to or completed by participants, into the six 21 most common non-English languages spoken by individuals with limited 22 English proficiency in the authority that offers this program; 23 (2) offer, upon request, interpretation services between the authority 24 and an individual in the individual's primary language with respect to 25 the provision of services or benefits; and 26 (3) offer, upon request or demonstrated need, services to an individ- 27 ual who requires additional assistance due to partial or total deafness, 28 blindness, speech impediment, or cognitive impairment. 29 § 3. Subdivision 7 of section 459-c of the real property tax law, as 30 amended by section 2 of part B of chapter 686 of the laws of 2022, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 7. (a) Application for such exemption must be made annually by the 33 owner, or all of the owners of the property, on forms prescribed by the 34 commissioner, and shall be filed in such assessor's office on or before 35 the appropriate taxable status date; provided, however, proof of a 36 permanent disability need be submitted only in the year exemption pursu- 37 ant to this section is first sought or the disability is first deter- 38 mined to be permanent. 39 (b) The assessing authority responsible for the administration of such 40 tax exemption shall develop and implement a plan to ensure adequate 41 access to information by individuals who have limited English proficien- 42 cy or otherwise require communication assistance. Such authority shall: 43 (1) translate necessary documents, including but not limited to, forms 44 and instructions provided to or completed by participants, into the six 45 most common non-English languages spoken by individuals with limited 46 English proficiency in the authority that offers this program; 47 (2) offer, upon request, interpretation services between the authority 48 and an individual in the individual's primary language with respect to 49 the provision of services or benefits; and 50 (3) offer, upon request or demonstrated need, services to an individ- 51 ual who requires additional assistance due to partial or total deafness, 52 blindness, speech impediment, or cognitive impairment. 53 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.